District of Columbia statutes.
16-1048

Transitional provision.

This subchapter applies to protection orders issued before the effective date of this subchapter and to continuing actions for enforcement of foreign protection orders commenced before the effective date of this subchapter. A request for enforcement of a foreign protection order made on or after the effective date of this subchapter for violations of a foreign protection order occurring before the effective date of this subchapter is governed by this subchapter.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.
The “effective date of this subchapter”, referred to in text, is April 11, 2003, which is the effective date of D.C. Law 14-296.